Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3519
Eminent domain; procedure.

Subject to the limitations related to state property set out in subsection (2) of section 18-3520, whenever the board of trustees or administrator of any community improvement district shall by order determine to make any public improvement under the provisions of the Community Improvement District Act which shall require that private property be taken or damaged, the community improvement district may exercise the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. Such taking by the community improvement district may be effected only after approval by the city or village having any zoning jurisdiction over such property.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 19.
April 17, 2026